Utah statutes.
34-29-19.   Deceptive or duplicate orders for employees -- Liability to
applicants.
Any person who places with an employment agent an order for more employees
than he actually desires, or who places with employment agents duplicate
orders for employees, or who permits a standing order for employees to remain
uncanceled at a time when he does not need such employees, shall be liable to
persons who, in good faith, accept and act upon information furnished in good
faith by employment agents under such excess, duplicate or standing order for
the amount actually expended in traveling from the location of such employment
agency to the place of such proposed employment and return.
